Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.400

Resort contracts—Voidable—Estoppel.

Any camping resort contract entered into in violation of this chapter may be voided by the purchaser and the purchaser's entire consideration recovered at the option of the purchaser, but no suit under this section may be brought after two years from the date the contract is signed.

[ 1988 c 159 s 16; 1982 c 69 s 11.]